Illinois, session 104th, HB2108.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Hydrogen Fuel Replacement Tax Credit Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 55/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Hydrogen Fuel Replacement Tax Credit Act.9(Source: P.A. 103-268, eff. 7-25-23.)